Maryland, session 2026, HB0817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1213. 9–303.6.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS AND STANDARDS GOVERNING THE PERMITTING OF CARBON
REMOVAL TECHNOLOGY AND PRACTICES THAT ARE CERTIFIED BY AN
INTERNATIONALLY RECOGNIZED THIRD–PARTY CERTIFICATION BODY DIOXIDE
CAPTURE, REMOVAL, OR SEQUESTRATION PROJECTS THAT UTILIZE BIOCHAR OR
WOOD VAULT TECHNOLOGIES.
(B) IN DEVELOPING THE REGULATIONS AND STANDARDS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.
(B) EACH STATE AGENCY SHALL USE AVAILABLE FUNDING SOURCES TO
FUND CARBON REMOVAL PROJECTS THAT UTILIZE CARBON REMOVAL TECHNOLOGY
AND PRACTICES THAT ARE CERTIFIED BY AN INTERNATIONALLY RECOGNIZED
THIRD–PARTY CERTIFICATION BODY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.